Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1585.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7518. Prohibition against publishing or disseminating booking photographs for commercial use.(a) Offense defined.--A person that is engaged in publishing or otherwise disseminating a booking photograph is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree if the person solicits or accepts the payment of a fee or other consideration to remove, correct, modify or refrain from publishing or otherwise disseminating the booking photograph.(b) Separate violations.-- Each payment or other consideration solicited or accepted in violation of this section <--123456789101112131415161718 constitutes a separate violation.(c) Violation of Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.--C onduct that would constitute an offense under this section shall be deemed to be a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(d) Venue.--An offense committed under this section is deemed to have been committed where the solicitation or acceptance of a fee or other consideration was made or received.(e) Territorial applicability.--A person may be convicted under the provisions of this section if the victim or offender is located within this Commonwealth.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Booking photograph." A photograph or image of an individual generated by law enforcement for identification purposes in accordance with 61 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to recording system for identification of criminal offenders).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 18 (CRIMES AND OFFENSES) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN THEFT AND RELATED OFFENSES, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSE OF THEFT BY EXTORTION; AND, IN CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION, PROVIDING FOR REQUEST AND REMOVAL OF THE DISSEMINATION OF BOOKING PHOTOGRAPHS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTION 3923 OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 3923. THEFT BY EXTORTION.* * *(A.1) PROHIBITION ON CONSIDERATION FOR THE DESTRUCTION AND 20250HB1585PN3544 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 REMOVAL OF BOOKING PHOTOGRAPHS.--A PERSON THAT IS ENGAGED IN PUBLISHING OR OTHERWISE DISSEMINATING A BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH COMMITS AN OFFENSE IF THE PERSON SOLICITS OR ACCEPTS THE PAYMENT OF A FEE OR OTHER CONSIDERATION TO REMOVE AND DESTROY OR REFRAIN FROM PUBLISHING OR OTHERWISE DISSEMINATING THE BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH. EACH PAYMENT OR OTHER CONSIDERATION SOLICITED OR ACCEPTED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION.* * *(C) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH" MEANS A PHOTOGRAPH OR IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL GENERATED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT FOR IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES IN ACCORDANCE WITH 61 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO RECORDING SYSTEM FOR IDENTIFICATION OF CRIMINAL OFFENDERS).SECTION 2. TITLE 18 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 9126. REQUEST AND REMOVAL OF THE DISSEMINATION OF BOOKING PHOTOGRAPHS.(A) REQUIREMENTS.--A NONCRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY THAT IS ENGAGED IN PUBLISHING OR OTHERWISE DISSEMINATING A BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH SHALL:(1) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY POST ON THE NONCRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AN ACTIVE AND MONITORED EMAIL ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER AND MAILING ADDRESS BY WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST THE REMOVAL AND DESTRUCTION OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH.(2) REMOVE AND DESTROY AN INDIVIDUAL'S BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS OF RECEIVING A REQUEST FOR REMOVAL AND DESTRUCTION FROM THE INDIVIDUAL IF:(I) THE BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH RELATES TO CRIMINAL 20250HB1585PN3544 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHARGES THAT:(A) RESULTED IN A FINAL DISPOSITION OTHER THAN A CONVICTION;(B) ARE SUBJECT TO A COURT ORDER FOR LIMITED ACCESS AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 9122.1 (RELATING TO PETITION FOR LIMITED ACCESS);(C) WERE GRANTED CLEAN SLATE LIMITED ACCESS UNDER SECTION 9122.2 (RELATING TO CLEAN SLATE LIMITED ACCESS); OR(D) WERE EXPUNGED OR VACATED PURSUANT TO A COURT ORDER OR WERE PARDONED THROUGH EXECUTIVE ACTION.(II) THE INDIVIDUAL REQUESTING REMOVAL AND DESTRUCTION SUBMITS REASONABLE DOCUMENTATION SUPPORTING ELIGIBILITY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.(B) SANCTION.--IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 9183 (RELATING TO CIVIL ACTIONS), A NONCRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (A)(2) SHALL BE LIABLE FOR A CIVIL PENALTY OF $100 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY FOLLOWING THE EXPIRATION OF THE SEVEN-CALENDAR-DAY PERIOD DURING WHICH THE BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH REMAINS PUBLISHED OR OTHERWISE DISSEMINATED.(C) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "BOOKING PHOTOGRAPH" MEANS A PHOTOGRAPH OR IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL GENERATED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT FOR IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES IN ACCORDANCE WITH 61 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO RECORDING SYSTEM FOR IDENTIFICATION OF CRIMINAL OFFENDERS).SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1585PN3544 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627